Kentucky statutes. TITLE XIX Public Safety and Morals
CHAPTER 238 Charitable Gaming

238.010.
Definitions. [Repealed.]

238.020.
Adoption of chapter by local option. [Repealed.]

238.030.
Filing petition to put questions on ballot. [Repealed.]

238.040.
Form of question on ballot — Election costs. [Repealed.]

238.050.
Effect of election. [Repealed.]

238.060.
Resubmission of question following rejection. [Repealed.]

238.070.
Procedure for rescinding application of chapter. [Repealed.]

238.080.
Form of question in rescission election — Election costs. [Repealed.]

238.090.
Effect of election on rescission. [Repealed.]

238.100.
Organization and games which city may license. [Repealed.]

238.110.
Application for license. [Repealed.]

238.120.
City’s investigation before granting license — Maximum duration of license. [Repealed.]

238.130.
Hearing required before refusal of license — Amendment of license. [Repealed.]

238.140.
Form, contents, display of license. [Repealed.]

238.150.
City’s control, supervision of games. [Repealed.]

238.160.
Minimum age of players. [Repealed.]

238.170.
Persons permitted to conduct games — Permissible expenses. [Repealed.]

238.180.
Advertising of games regulated. [Repealed.]

238.190.
Required reports. [Repealed.]

238.200.
Audit of licensees. [Repealed.]

238.210.
Appeal from city’s action. [Repealed.]

238.220.
Immunity of licensed games. [Repealed.]

238.230.
Renting premises. [Repealed.]

238.240.
Approval required for renter. [Repealed.]

238.250.
Application for renter’s license. [Repealed.]

238.260.
Restrictions on granting renter’s license. [Repealed.]

238.270.
Fee for renter’s license — Temporary permit. [Repealed.]

238.280.
Suspension or revocation of renter’s license. [Repealed.]

238.290.
City’s regulatory power — Limitations thereon. [Repealed.]

238.300.
Accounting of money spent for rent. [Repealed.]

238.310.
General duties of commissioner. [Repealed.]

238.320.
Filing regulations. [Repealed.]

238.330.
Duty to police law. [Repealed.]

238.340.
Commissioner’s power to revoke or suspend licenses, institute prosecutions, hear appeals. [Repealed.]

238.350.
Commissioner to study bingo laws in other states. [Repealed.]

238.360.
Commissioner’s power to issue subpoena — Immunity of witnesses from prosecution and arrest. [Repealed.]

238.370.
Enforcement of subpoena by circuit court. [Repealed.]

238.380.
Administrative expenses. [Repealed.]

238.390.
City’s report to commissioner. [Repealed.]

238.400.
Commissioner’s report to Governor. [Repealed.]

238.410.
Citation of chapter. [Repealed.]

238.500.
Purpose — Intent — Construction.

The General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky hereby declares that charitable gaming conducted by charitable organizations is an important method of raising funds for legitimate charitable purposes and is in the public interest. The purpose of this chapter is to comply with constitutional requirements by establishing an effective and efficient mechanism for regulating charitable gaming which includes defining the scope of charitable gaming activities, setting standards for the conduct of charitable gaming which insure honesty and integrity, providing for means of accounting for all moneys generated through the conduct of charitable gaming, and providing for suitable penalties for violations of laws and administrative regulations. The intent of this chapter is to prevent the commercialization of charitable gaming, to prevent participation in charitable gaming by criminal and other undesirable elements, and to prevent the diversion of funds from legitimate charitable purposes. In order to carry out the purpose and intent, the provisions of this chapter, and any administrative regulations promulgated in accordance with this chapter, shall be construed in the public interest and strictly enforced.

History.

Enact. Acts 1994, ch. 66, § 1, effective March 16, 1994.

238.505.
Definitions for chapter.

As used in this chapter, unless the context requires otherwise:

“Department” means the Department of Charitable Gaming within the Public Protection Cabinet;

“Charitable gaming” means bingo, charity game tickets, raffles, and charity fundraising events conducted for fundraising purposes by charitable organizations licensed and regulated under the provisions of this chapter. “Charitable gaming” shall not include slot machines, electronic video gaming devices, wagering on live sporting events, or simulcast broadcasts of horse races;

“Charitable organization” means a nonprofit entity organized for charitable, religious, educational, literary, civic, fraternal, or patriotic purposes;

“Bingo” means a specific game of chance in which participants use cards or paper sheets, or card-minding device representations thereof, divided into horizontal and vertical spaces, each of which is designated by a letter and a number, and prizes are awarded on the basis of the letters and numbers on the card conforming to a predetermined and preannounced configuration of letters and numbers selected at random;

“Charity game ticket” means a game of chance using a folded or banded paper ticket, or a paper card with perforated break-open tabs, or electronic pulltab device representations thereof, the face of which is covered or otherwise hidden from view to conceal a number, letter, symbol, or set of numbers, letters, or symbols, some of which have been designated in advance as prize winners and shall include charity game tickets that utilize a seal card. “Charity game ticket” shall include pulltabs, both paper and electronic representations thereof;

“Seal card” means a board or placard used in conjunction with charity game tickets, that contains a seal or seals which, when removed or opened, reveal predesignated winning numbers, letters, or symbols;

“Raffle” means a game of chance in which a participant is required to purchase a ticket for a chance to win a prize, with the winner to be determined by a random drawing;

“Charity fundraising event” means an activity of limited duration at which games of chance approved by the department are conducted, including bingo, raffles, charity game tickets, special limited charitable games, and wagering on prerecorded horse races, KRS Chapter 230 notwithstanding. Examples of such activities include events that attract patrons for community, social, and entertainment purposes apart from charitable gaming, such as fairs, festivals, carnivals, licensed charitable gaming organization conventions, bazaars, and banquets. For the purposes of this subsection, “banquet” shall mean a formal meal or feast held by a charitable organization for community, social, or entertainment purposes apart from charitable gaming;

“Manufacturer” means a person who assembles from raw materials or subparts any charitable gaming equipment or supplies used in the conduct of charitable gaming, including a person who converts, modifies, and adds to or removes parts from, charitable gaming equipment and supplies. The term shall not include:

Any person who services or repairs charitable gaming supplies and equipment, so long as that person replaces or repairs an incidental, malfunctioning, or nonfunctioning part with a similar or identical part; and

Any distributor who cuts, collates, and packages for distribution any gaming supplies and equipment purchased in bulk;

“Distributor” means a person who sells, markets, leases, or otherwise furnishes to a charitable organization charitable gaming equipment or supplies, or both, used in the conduct of charitable gaming. “Distributor” shall not include:

A resident printer who prints raffle tickets at the request of a licensed charitable organization; and

A licensed charitable organization that affects a one-time donation of charitable gaming supplies or equipment to another licensed charitable organization if the donation is first approved by the department.

“Charitable gaming facility” means the premises on which charitable gaming is conducted;

“Gross receipts” means all moneys collected or received from the conduct of charitable gaming;

“Adjusted gross receipts” means gross receipts less all cash prizes and the amount paid for merchandise prizes purchased;

“Net receipts” means adjusted gross receipts less all expenses, charges, fees, and deductions authorized under this chapter;

“Charitable gaming supplies and equipment” means any material, device, apparatus, or paraphernalia customarily used in the conduct of charitable gaming, including bingo cards and paper, charity game tickets, and other apparatus or paraphernalia used in conducting games of chance at charity fundraising events subject to regulation under this chapter. The term shall not include any material, device, apparatus, or paraphernalia incidental to the game, such as pencils, daubers, playing cards, or other supplies that may be purchased from normal sources of supply;

“Door prize” means a prize awarded to a person based solely upon the person’s attendance at an event or the purchase of a ticket to attend an event;

“Special limited charitable game” means roulette; blackjack; poker; keno; money wheel; baccarat; pusher-type games; any dice game where the player competes against the house; and any other game of chance as identified, defined, and approved by administrative regulation of the department;

“Special limited charity fundraising event” means any type of charity fundraising event, commonly known as and operated as a “casino night,” “Las Vegas night,” or “Monte Carlo night,” at which the predominant number or types of games offered for play are special limited charitable games;

“Session” or “bingo session” means a single gathering at which a bingo game or series of successive bingo games are played, excluding bingo played at a charity fundraising event;

“Immediate family” means:

Spouse and parents-in-law;

Parents and grandparents;

Children and their spouses; and

Siblings and their spouses;

“Affiliate” means any corporation, partnership, association, or other business or professional entity or any natural person that directly or indirectly, through one or more intermediaries, controls, or is controlled by, or is under common control with a licensed manufacturer, distributor, or charitable gaming facility;

“Secretary” means the secretary of the Public Protection Cabinet;

“Commissioner” means the commissioner of the Department of Charitable Gaming within the Public Protection Cabinet;

“Chairperson” means the chief executive officer and any officer, member, or employee of a licensed charitable organization who will be involved in the management and supervision of charitable gaming as designated in the organization’s charitable gaming license application under KRS 238.535(13)(g);

“Year” means calendar year except as used in subsection (11) of this section and KRS 238.535(11), 238.545(4), 238.547(1), and 238.555(7), when “year” means the licensee’s license year;

“Card-minding device” means any mechanical, electronic, electromechanical, or computerized device that is interfaced with or connected to equipment used to conduct a game of bingo and that allows a player to store, display, and mark a bingo card face. A card-minding device shall not be designed and manufactured to resemble any electronic gaming device that utilizes a video display monitor, such as a video lottery terminal, video slot machine, video poker machine, or any similar video gaming device;

“Electronic pulltab device” means an electronic device used only for charitable gaming to facilitate the play of an electronic pulltab. An electronic pulltab device shall be a tablet or other personal computing device, other than a mobile phone or similar handheld device, as approved by the department. An electronic pulltab device may only operate on a closed network or intranet that is confined to the licensee’s premises, and shall not be Internet accessible by patrons, but shall be connected to a central server system solely for the purposes of monitoring, reporting, accounting, and software maintenance. An electronic pulltab device shall not be designed and manufactured to resemble any electronic gaming device that utilizes a video display monitor, such as a video lottery terminal, video slot machine, video poker machine, or any similar video gaming device; and

“Electronic video gaming device,” as used in this chapter and the related administrative regulations, means any device that possesses a video display and computer mechanism for playing a game. Electronic video gaming device shall not mean any electronic representation of charitable gaming games identified, defined, and approved by statute and by administrative regulation of the department.

History.

Enact. Acts 1994, ch. 66, § 2, effective March 16, 1994; 1996, ch. 331, § 2, effective April 10, 1996; 1998, ch. 232, § 1, effective April 1, 1998; 2000, ch. 374, § 2, effective July 14, 2000; 2007, ch. 120, § 9, effective June 26, 2007; 2010, ch. 24, § 533, effective July 15, 2010; 2015 ch. 45, § 1, effective June 24, 2015; 2015 ch. 59, § 1, effective June 24, 2015; 2015 ch. 106, § 3, effective June 24, 2015; 2021 ch. 200, § 1, effective April 8, 2021.

238.510.
Department of Charitable Gaming — Commissioner — Conflicts of interest of staff — Charitable gaming investigators.

The Department of Charitable Gaming is created as a department within the Public Protection Cabinet. The department shall license and regulate the conduct of charitable gaming and license and regulate charitable organizations that desire to engage in charitable gaming, charitable gaming facilities, manufacturers, and distributors in the Commonwealth of Kentucky in accordance with the provisions of this chapter.

The department shall be headed by a commissioner who shall be appointed by the Governor. The commissioner shall employ staff as may be necessary to administer and enforce the provisions of this chapter.

All department staff shall be classified and employed in accordance with applicable personnel requirements of the Personnel Cabinet in accordance with KRS Chapter 18A.

No employee of the department during his or her term of employment shall be an officer in a charitable organization that is licensed to conduct charitable gaming or be involved in the conduct of charitable gaming as a member of a licensed charitable organization. No employee of the department during his or her term of employment shall be licensed as a manufacturer, distributor, or charitable gaming facility, or have a financial interest in any business that is licensed as a manufacturer, distributor, or charitable gaming facility.

The commissioner shall appoint charitable gaming investigators who shall have the powers of peace officers throughout the Commonwealth; however, those powers shall be limited to:

Enforcement of the provisions of KRS Chapter 238, relating to charitable gaming;

Violations of KRS Chapter 528, relating to:

Unlicensed and illegal charitable gaming;

Gambling offenses committed on licensed charitable gaming premises; and

Gambling offenses committed in conjunction with charitable gaming;

Violations of KRS Chapter 514, relating to theft, embezzlement, or other illegal diversions of charitable gaming proceeds;

Violations of KRS Chapters 516 and 517, relating to forgery and fraud in the conduct of charitable gaming;

Violations relating to the damage or destruction of real or personal property owned or leased by a charitable gaming licensee; and

Violation of any criminal felony offense committed:

On licensed charitable gaming premises; and

In the presence of a charitable gaming investigator.

Charitable gaming investigators shall satisfy the certification standards established by the Department of Criminal Justice Training pursuant to KRS Chapter 15. The commissioner may possess peace officer powers granted under subsection (5) of this section, if he or she is duly qualified. Charitable gaming investigators shall not qualify for hazardous duty coverage under the Kentucky Employees Retirement System.

Charitable gaming investigators so appointed shall not possess peace officer powers other than those provided in subsection (5) of this section.

History.

Enact. Acts 1994, ch. 66, § 3, effective March 16, 1994; 1996, ch. 331, § 3, effective April 10, 1996; 1998, ch. 154, § 87, effective July 15, 1998; 2000, ch. 374, § 3, effective July 14, 2000; 2010, ch. 24, § 534, effective July 15, 2010.

238.515.
Powers and duties of department.

The department shall license and regulate the conduct of charitable gaming in the Commonwealth of Kentucky. In discharging this responsibility, the department shall have the following powers and duties:

Licensing charitable organizations, charitable gaming facilities, manufacturers, and distributors that desire to engage in charitable gaming;

Establishing and enforcing reasonable standards for the conduct of charitable gaming and the operation of charitable gaming facilities;

Prescribing reasonable fees for licenses;

Establishing standards of accounting, recordkeeping, and reporting to insure charitable gaming receipts are properly accounted for;

Establishing a process for reviewing complaints and allegations of wrongdoing, and for investigating complaints with merit. In furtherance of this duty, the department shall have the authority to issue administrative subpoenas and summonses. The department shall also establish toll-free telephone service for receiving complaints and inquiries;

Taking appropriate disciplinary action and making referrals for criminal prosecution of persons who do not operate in compliance with this chapter;

Collecting and depositing all fees and fines in the charitable gaming regulatory account and administering the account;

Employing necessary staff, securing adequate office space, and executing other administrative and logistical matters as may be necessary to assure proper functioning of the department; and

Promulgating administrative regulations, in accordance with KRS Chapter 13A, which are necessary to carry out the purposes and intent of this chapter. Any administrative regulation proposed by the department that changes the manner in which a charitable organization conducts charitable gaming or is likely to cause a charitable organization to incur new or additional costs shall be subject to the requirements of KRS

238.522

. In promulgating administrative regulations under this subsection, the department shall submit any proposed regulations to the advisory commission established under KRS

238.520

, and shall not promulgate the administrative regulations without giving the advisory commission the opportunity to produce written comments in accordance with KRS

238.522

. If the advisory commission chooses to produce written comments, the comments shall be attached to any public submission of the administrative regulation, including any filing under KRS Chapter 13A.

History.

Enact. Acts 1994, ch. 66, § 4, effective March 16, 1994; 1996, ch. 331, § 4, effective April 10, 1996; 1998, ch. 232, § 2, effective April 1, 1998; 2000, ch. 374, § 4, effective July 14, 2000; 2007, ch. 120, § 6, effective June 26, 2007; 2010, ch. 24, § 535, effective July 15, 2010.

238.520.
Charitable Gaming Advisory Commission.

The Charitable Gaming Advisory Commission is created to be composed of nine (9) members consisting of:

The secretary of the Public Protection Cabinet or his designee;

The Attorney General or his designee;

One (1) representative from the Kentucky Commonwealth’s Attorneys Association;

One (1) representative from the Kentucky Charitable Gaming Association;

One (1) certified public accountant;

One (1) member selected from the public at large;

One (1) representative selected from the Joint Executive Council of Veterans Organizations of Kentucky;

One (1) representative from Catholic organizations; and

One (1) representative from Kentucky’s volunteer firefighter organizations.

The certified public accountant, the one (1) at-large member, and the representatives from the Kentucky Commonwealth’s Attorneys Association and the Kentucky Charitable Gaming Association shall be appointed by the Governor. The representative from each of the two (2) associations, the one (1) representative from the Joint Executive Council of Veterans Organizations of Kentucky, the one (1) representative from the Catholic organizations, and the one (1) representative from the volunteer firefighter organizations shall be selected from a list of at least three (3) names submitted to the Governor by the respective association.

Initial appointments to the commission shall be for staggered terms as follows: one (1) member for a term of one (1) year; two (2) members for a term of two (2) years; two (2) members for a term of three (3) years; and two (2) members for a term of four (4) years. Thereafter, each member shall be appointed for a term of four (4) years. No member from the public at large shall be appointed in the same year. Vacancies shall be filled in the same manner as the original appointment for the unexpired portion of the term. No member of the commission may serve more than two (2) full terms.

The Charitable Gaming Advisory Commission shall provide ongoing advice and input to the department and to the General Assembly but shall not become directly involved in the licensing and regulation of charitable gaming by the department.

The commission shall meet quarterly, upon the request of the chair or four (4) of its members or as otherwise directed by the department. Five (5) members shall constitute a quorum for conducting business. The commission shall annually elect a chairman from its membership, and no person elected chairman shall serve more than two (2) consecutive terms of one (1) year each. Members shall receive no compensation for serving on the commission, but shall be reimbursed for travel expenses for attending meetings and performing other official functions, consistent with state reimbursement policy for state employees.

History.

Enact. Acts 1994, ch. 66, § 5, effective March 16, 1994; 1996, ch. 331, § 15, effective April 10, 1996; 1998, ch. 232, § 3, effective April 1, 1998; 2000, ch. 374, § 5, effective July 14, 2000; 2007, ch. 120, § 5, effective June 26, 2007; 2010, ch. 24, § 536, effective July 15, 2010.

238.522.
Restriction on promulgating administrative regulations.

If the department has proposed a new or amended administrative regulation that changes the manner in which a charitable organization conducts charitable gaming or is likely to cause a charitable organization to incur new or additional costs, the department shall not promulgate the proposed administrative regulation without first receiving comments from the Charitable Gaming Advisory Commission established in KRS

238.520

, subject to the restrictions of paragraph (b) of this subsection.

If the proposed administrative regulation qualifies under paragraph (a) of this subsection, the department shall distribute the proposed administrative regulation to the advisory commission.

The advisory commission shall be granted a maximum of sixty (60) days to submit its comments on the proposed regulatory change. If the administrative regulation is a new emergency regulation, the advisory commission shall be granted a maximum of thirty (30) days to submit its comments on the proposed regulatory change.

The time limits in this paragraph shall begin from the day the department submits the regulatory change and sets a date for a proposed hearing for the comments of the advisory commission. If the advisory commission is already scheduled to meet at a time that will give it an adequate opportunity to review the regulation and respond, the hearing may be held at that meeting.

If an advisory commission is not scheduled to meet, the department shall arrange for the advisory commission to meet at a time that will provide the advisory commission an adequate opportunity to review and comment on the regulation within the time limit. If the advisory commission fails to comment within the time limit, the department may proceed with the administrative changes at its discretion.

To the extent that any other statute relating to the department’s authority to promulgate administrative regulations conflicts with this section, this section shall take precedence.

If the advisory commission chooses to produce written comments, these comments shall be attached to any public submission of the administrative regulation, including any filing under KRS Chapter 13A, and may include majority or minority comments or both.

Any power or limitation relating to administrative regulations promulgated by the department that are subject to subsection (1) of this section shall also apply to administrative regulations promulgated by the commissioner of the department.

History.

Enact. Acts 2007, ch. 120, § 4, effective June 26, 2007; 2010, ch. 24, § 537, effective July 15, 2010.

238.525.
Licensing requirements — Criminal history background check — Disqualification.

Licenses shall be issued by the department on an annual or biennial basis, except as otherwise permitted in KRS

238.530

and

238.545

. A license term may be determined by the department in any manner it deems appropriate to facilitate efficient licensing. The department shall charge a renewal fee not to exceed the maximum amounts established in KRS

238.530

,

238.535

, and

238.555

.

The department may issue a temporary license to an applicant who has met the requirements for a license. A temporary license shall be valid from the date of issuance until the regular license is issued or for a period of sixty (60) days, whichever is shorter. A temporary license shall not be renewed, except for good cause and shall not exceed a total of nine (9) months in length.

An applicant for any license to be issued under KRS

238.530

and

238.555

shall be subjected to a state and national criminal history background check by the department, with the assistance of the Department of Kentucky State Police and the Federal Bureau of Investigation. An applicant for any license to be issued under KRS

238.535

shall be subjected to a state criminal history background check and may, if deemed reasonably necessary, be subjected to a national criminal history background check by the department with the assistance of the Department of Kentucky State Police and the Federal Bureau of Investigation. The criminal history background check shall apply to the chief executive officer and the chief financial officer or director of an applicant; any employee or member of an applicant who has been designated as chairperson of the charitable gaming activity; the applicant itself; and any individual with a ten percent (10%) or more financial interest in the applicant. The department shall require the fingerprinting of all applicants for licensure under KRS

238.530

and

238.555

and may require, if deemed reasonably necessary, the fingerprints of all applicants for licensure under KRS

238.535

, who are natural persons in connection with the national criminal history background check to assure the identity of the applicant or applicants. The department may charge a reasonable fee not to exceed the actual cost of fingerprinting and records searching.

No applicant shall be licensed and no license holder shall be able to maintain a license if an individual associated with the applicant or license holder in a capacity listed in subsection (3) of this section or the applicant or license holder itself has been convicted of a felony, gambling offense, criminal fraud, forgery, theft, falsifying business records, violation of KRS 238.995(7), or any two (2) misdemeanor crimes in federal court or the courts of any state, the District of Columbia, or any territory, consistent with the provisions of KRS Chapter 335B within ten (10) years preceding the application for licensure.

No applicant shall be licensed unless all applicants required to be fingerprinted under the provision of subsection (3) of this section have been fingerprinted. The Department of Kentucky State Police may submit fingerprints of any applicant to the Federal Bureau of Investigation for the national criminal history background check. The department may by administrative regulation impose additional qualifications to meet the requirements of Pub. L. 92-544.

If a change occurs in any information submitted during the license application process, the applicant or licensee shall notify the department in writing within thirty (30) days of the date the change occurred.

History.

Enact. Acts 1994, ch. 66, § 6, effective March 16, 1994; 1996, ch. 331, § 5, effective April 10, 1996; 1998, ch. 232, § 4, effective April 1, 1998; 2000, ch. 374, § 6, effective July 14, 2000; 2007, ch. 85, § 272, effective June 26, 2007; 2010, ch. 24, § 538, effective July 15, 2010.

238.530.
Licensing of distributors and manufacturers of supplies and equipment — Eligibility — Restrictions.

No person shall sell, offer to sell, rent, lease, or otherwise furnish charitable gaming supplies or equipment unless the person is licensed by the department as a distributor. The department shall charge a license fee not to exceed one thousand dollars ($1,000).

No person shall sell, offer to sell, rent, lease, or otherwise furnish charitable gaming supplies and equipment unless the person is licensed by the department as a manufacturer. The department shall charge a license fee not to exceed one thousand dollars ($1,000).

No person who is licensed as a charitable organization, and no owner, officer, employee, or member of the immediate family of an owner, officer, or employee of a licensed charitable gaming facility shall be eligible for licensure as a distributor or manufacturer. No affiliate of an owner, officer, or employee, or member of the immediate family of an owner, officer, or employee of a licensed charitable gaming facility shall be licensed as a distributor or manufacturer. No person who is a licensed wholesaler or distributor of alcoholic beverages shall be licensed as a distributor or manufacturer. No person who is licensed as a distributor shall be licensed as a manufacturer, and no person licensed as a manufacturer shall be licensed as a distributor.

An applicant for a license as a manufacturer or distributor shall apply for license on forms provided by the department and shall submit as part of the application process the following:

The full name, address, date of birth, and Social Security number of the applicant;

If the applicant is a corporation or other business entity, the names, addresses, dates of birth, and Social Security numbers of all officers and management personnel;

The name, address, date of birth, and Social Security number of any individual who has ten percent (10%) or more financial interest in the applicant organization;

Federal employer tax number;

A sworn statement by the applicant or the appropriate officer that all information provided is true and correct and that the applicant agrees to comply with the applicable provisions of this chapter and all applicable administrative regulations promulgated thereunder;

The name, address, and telephone number of a registered agent within the Commonwealth of Kentucky, if the applicant is not a resident; and

Any other information the department deems appropriate.

Each licensed manufacturer and distributor shall maintain a complete set of records as may be required by the department to document all activities related to the sale, rental, lease, or furnishing of charitable gaming supplies and equipment in the Commonwealth of Kentucky. These records shall be available for inspection by the department at reasonable times, and all records shall be maintained for a minimum of three (3) years. The department may require a licensed manufacturer and distributor to report on its activity, with the content and frequency of these reports to be prescribed by administrative regulation promulgated by the department.

A distributor who does not receive payment in accordance with the terms of its sales or lease agreement from a licensed charitable organization within thirty (30) days of the delivery of charitable gaming supplies and equipment shall notify the department of the delinquency in writing in a form and manner prescribed by the department. A manufacturer who does not receive payment in full from a distributor within sixty (60) days of the delivery of charitable gaming supplies and equipment shall notify the department of the delinquency in writing in a form and manner prescribed by the department.

A licensed manufacturer shall not sell charitable gaming supplies and equipment to any person not licensed as a distributor in the Commonwealth of Kentucky.

A licensed distributor shall not sell charitable gaming supplies and equipment to any person not licensed as a distributor or a charitable organization in the Commonwealth of Kentucky, unless the organization is exempted from licensure under the provisions of this chapter.

A licensed distributor shall not purchase charitable gaming supplies and equipment from any person not licensed as a manufacturer or distributor in the Commonwealth of Kentucky.

No officer, owner, employee, or contractee of a licensed distributor or licensed manufacturer or their affiliates and no member of the immediate family of an owner, officer, employee, or contractee of a licensed distributor or licensed manufacturer or their affiliates, shall, with respect to a licensed charitable organization:

Manage or otherwise be involved in the conduct of charitable gaming;

Provide bookkeeping or other accounting services related to the conduct of charitable gaming;

Handle any moneys generated in the conduct of charitable gaming;

Advise a licensed charitable organization on the expenditure of net receipts;

Provide transportation services in any manner to patrons of a charitable gaming activity;

Provide advertisement or marketing services in any manner to a licensed charitable organization;

Provide, coordinate, or solicit the services of personnel or volunteers in any manner;

Provide training or consulting on the conduct of charitable gaming, except in connection with the use of its own equipment or supplies;

Store its charitable gaming equipment or supplies in or on the premises of a licensed charitable gaming facility; or

Donate or give any prize to be awarded in the conduct of charitable gaming.

History.

Enact. Acts 1994, ch. 66, § 7, effective March 16, 1994; 1996, ch. 331, § 6, effective April 10, 1996; 1998, ch. 232, § 5, effective April 1, 1998; 2000, ch. 374, § 7, effective July 14, 2000; 2010, ch. 24, § 539, effective July 15, 2010.